Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6904
Creditable coverage, defined.

(1) Creditable coverage means, with respect to an individual, coverage of the individual under any of the following:

(a) A group health plan;

(b) Health insurance coverage;

(c) Part A or Part B of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act;

(d) Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. 1396 et seq., other than coverage consisting solely of benefits under section 1928 of the act, 42 U.S.C. 1396s;

(e) 10 U.S.C. chapter 55, as such chapter existed on January 1, 2003;

(f) A medical care program of the Indian Health Service or of a tribal organization;

(g) A state health benefits risk pool;

(h) A health plan offered under 5 U.S.C. 8901 et seq.;

(i) A public health plan as defined under regulations promulgated by the federal Secretary of Health and Human Services; and

(j) A health benefit plan under 22 U.S.C. 2504.

(2) Creditable coverage shall not include any coverage that occurs before a significant break in coverage. For purposes of this section, a significant break in coverage shall mean any period of sixty-three consecutive days during all of which the individual does not have any creditable coverage, except that neither a waiting period nor an affiliation period shall be taken into account in determining a significant break in coverage.

(3) Creditable coverage shall not include coverage consisting solely of coverage of excepted benefits as that term is defined in the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, 29 U.S.C. 1191b, and regulations adopted pursuant to the act and in effect on April 19, 1998.

Laws 1997, LB 862, § 4;

Laws 1998, LB 1035, § 13;

Laws 2003, LB 6, § 4.